Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licensing

§ 2041.
Unlawful practice.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the practice of pharmacy unless licensed to so practice under the provisions of this chapter; provided, however, physicians, dentists, veterinarians, osteopaths, or other practitioners of the healing arts who are licensed under the laws of this State may dispense and administer prescription drugs to their patients in the practice of their respective professions where specifically authorized to do so by statute of this State.

Any person, including a business entity, violating this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 266

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1981, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2007, No. 29

, § 31;

2017, No. 48

, § 12;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 2042.
Qualifications for licensure.

To obtain a license to engage in the practice of pharmacy, an applicant for licensure by examination shall:

have attained the age of majority;

have graduated and received the professional undergraduate degree from a school or college of pharmacy that has been approved by the Board of Pharmacy, or, for foreign-trained applicants, have successfully passed an examination demonstrating that their education was equivalent to the education at a Board-approved school or college;

if required by subdivision 2032(b)(3) of this title, have completed any internship program established by the Board or demonstrated experience in the practice of pharmacy that meets or exceeds any internship requirement established under this chapter;

have successfully passed an examination required by the Board of Pharmacy;

paid the fees specified by this chapter.

The Board may license by endorsement an applicant who is licensed under the laws of another state whose requirements the Board deems to be substantially equal to those of this State.

Licensing standards promulgated by the Board and its procedures shall be fair and reasonable and shall be designed and implemented to measure and reasonably ensure an applicant’s qualifications to practice pharmacy. They shall not be designed or implemented for the purpose of limiting the number of licensees.

If a licensee has a principal place of business, the license shall be prominently displayed at that place.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 266

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1981, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 52;

2009, No. 35

, § 33a.

§ 2042a.
Pharmacy technicians; qualifications for registration.

No person shall perform the duties of a pharmacy technician unless registered with the Board. To obtain a registration as a pharmacy technician, an applicant shall:

not have engaged in acts that affect the ability of the applicant to practice as a pharmacy technician;

if required by rules adopted by the Board, be certified or eligible for certification by a national pharmacy technician certification authority; and

have paid the fee specified in section 2046 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 60

, § 9; amended

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 2042b.
Repealed. 2019, No. 30, § 14.

§ 2043.
Repealed.
1981, No. 244 (Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§§ 2044,
2045.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 2046.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees:

Initial application: (A) Pharmacists $ 110.00 (B) Retail drug outlets $ 300.00 (C) Institutional drug outlets $ 400.00 (D) Manufacturing drug outlet $ 400.00 (E) Wholesale drug outlet $ 700.00 (F) Investigative and research projects $ 300.00 (G) Pharmacy technicians $ 50.00 (H) Outsourcing drug outlet $ 700.00 (I) Nuclear drug outlet $ 700.00 (J) Compounding drug outlet $ 700.00 (K) Home infusion drug outlet $ 700.00 (L) Third-party logistics $ 700.00 (M) Pharmacy interns $ 20.00 (2) Biennial renewal: (A) Pharmacists $ 125.00 (B) Retail drug outlets $ 400.00 (C) Institutional drug outlets $ 500.00 (D) Manufacturing drug outlet $ 500.00 (E) Wholesale drug outlet $ 500.00 (F) Investigative and research projects $ 300.00 (G) Pharmacy technicians $ 60.00 (H) Outsourcing drug outlet $ 500.00 (I) Nuclear drug outlet $ 500.00 (J) Compounding drug outlet $ 500.00 (K) Home infusion drug outlet $ 500.00 (L) Third-party logistics $ 500.00 (M) Pharmacy interns $ 45.00 (3) Pharmacy reinspection $ 100.00

Click to view

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 53;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 36;

1995, No. 47

, § 24;

2003, No. 60

, § 11;

2005, No. 27

, § 51;

2007, No. 76

, § 6;

2019, No. 70

, § 18.